Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 5. General Provisions as to Form and Manner of Issuance, Paymentand Transfer of Public Securities

§ 16-5-501.
Applicability.

This article applies to bonds, notes, warrants, certificates or other securities evidencing loans or the advancement of monies, heretofore or hereafter authorized to be issued by or on behalf of the state or any political subdivision, district, public board, agency, commission, authority or other public body corporate in the state pursuant to any general or special act or pursuant to any lawful legislative or home rule provision.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 89, § 1.

§ 16-5-502.
Form, payment and transfer of securities.

The securities described in W.S.

16-5-501

shall be in registered or bearer form, with or without interest coupons, be subject to such conditions for transfer, be subject to such provisions for conversion as to denomination or to bearer or registered form, be made registrable or payable, or both, by the treasurer or other officer of the issuing entity, or by trustee, registrar, paying agent or transfer agent within or without the state of Wyoming, be issued, transferred and registered by book entry, be in a denomination, bear such dates, signatures and authentications, and be held in custody by a depository within or without the state of Wyoming, all as may be determined by the entity or the governing body of the entity authorized or empowered to issue the securities. Payment at designated due dates or in installments may be required by the authorizing proceedings to be by check, draft or other medium of payment and need not be conditioned upon presentation of any security or coupon.

Bonds issued by or on behalf of a political subdivision of the state may be issued as digital securities, as defined by W.S. 34-29-101(a)(iii), if the bonds are otherwise issued in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 89,§ 1; 2020 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (b).

§ 16-5-503.
Determination by resolution or ordinance.

The determination of the body authorized or empowered to issue securities required by W.S.

16-5-502

shall be made in the resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of the securities or in any supplemental ordinance, resolution or other instrument.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 89, § 1.

§ 16-5-504.
No restriction on other acts.

This article as to the matters contained herein shall constitute an additional and separate grant of powers and these powers may be exercised without regard to provisions concerning matters in any other act but this article is not a restriction or limitation on the exercise of powers by an issuing entity under any other act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 89, § 1.